Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9510
Direct provider; acceptance of payments from medical assistance program.

Subject to the restrictions established in the Direct Primary Care Agreement Act, a direct provider may accept payment of direct service charges directly or indirectly from the medical assistance program under the Medical Assistance Act or any entity contracting with the State of Nebraska to provide managed care in the medical assistance program subject to any necessary approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 10.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.